Utah statutes.
53B-18-104.   Substations.
(1)  The university may establish and maintain substations to assist in
conducting the research provided for in Section 53B-18-101.
(2)  The university may discontinue the existence of a substation.
(3)  If a substation is created by legislative enactment, the university is
under no obligation to maintain the substation beyond that time for which
special appropriations are made by the Legislature.
